Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2274
Post-release supervision; report; contents.

(1) Beginning October 1, 2024, the Office of Probation Administration shall electronically submit a quarterly report to the Judiciary Committee of the Legislature and the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature regarding individuals serving sentences of post-release supervision. The report shall include:

(a) The number of individuals:

(i) On post-release supervision;

(ii) Successfully discharged from post-release supervision;

(iii) Unsuccessfully discharged from post-release supervision;

(iv) Whose post-release supervision is revoked for technical violations;

(v) Whose post-release supervision is revoked for law violations;

(vi) Who abscond and do not complete the conditions of post-release supervision;

(vii) Who are sent to jails to serve custodial sanctions; and

(viii) Whose post-release supervision has been revoked;

(b) The number of jail beds utilized for custodial sanctions and the number of days such beds are utilized;

(c) The types of programming offered to individuals on post-release supervision; and

(d) The risk scores of individuals on post-release supervision at the time they began serving a sentence of imprisonment and upon discharge from post-release supervision.

(2) The report shall redact all personal identifying information of individuals on post-release supervision.

Laws 2024, LB631, § 21.